Washington statutes.
RCW 26.09.182

Permanent parenting plan—Determination of relevant information.

Before entering a permanent parenting plan, the court shall determine the existence of any information and proceedings relevant to the placement of the child that are available in the judicial information system and databases.

[ 2007 c 496 s 304.]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—2007 c 496: See note following RCW 26.09.002.